Idaho, session 2025, H0422.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 39-258, Idaho Code, as amended in Section 2 of
House Bill No. 47, if enacted by the First Regular Session of the Sixty-
eighth Idaho Legislature, be, and the same is hereby amended to read as fol-
lows:
39-258. ADOPTION OF PERSONS BORN IN IDAHO -- NEW BIRTH CERTIFICATE IS-
SUED TO REPLACE ORIGINAL CERTIFICATE -- PROCEDURE -- ADOPTION PROCEEDINGS
NOT OPEN TO INSPECTION WITH CERTAIN EXCEPTIONS -- DUTIES OF THE CLERKS OF
COURTS ISSUING ADOPTION DECREES -- DUTIES OF STATE REGISTRAR OF VITAL STA-
TISTICS. (1) Whenever a final decree of adoption, issued by an Idaho court,
declares a person born in Idaho to be adopted by someone other than his or her
natural parents, the court shall require the preparation of a report (denom-
inated as a certificate in accordance with Idaho court rules) of adoption on
a form prescribed and furnished by the state registrar. The report shall in-
clude such facts as are necessary to locate and identify the certificate of
birth of the person adopted; shall provide information necessary to estab-
lish a new certificate of birth for the person adopted; and shall identify
the order of adoption and be certified by the clerk of the court.
(2) Information necessary to prepare the report of adoption shall be
furnished by each petitioner for adoption or the petitioner's attorney. The
provision of such information shall be prerequisite to the issuance of a fi-
nal decree in the matter of the court.
(3) The report of adoption shall, within fifteen (15) days after be-
coming final, be recorded by the clerk of the court with the bureau of vital
records and health statistics in the state department of health and welfare.
(4) If a court of some other state issued a decree or report of adoption
of a person actually born in Idaho, the certified copy or report may be sim-
ilarly filed by the person involved or by the adoptive parents. Failure to
file certified copies or reports of said decrees within said period of time,
however, shall not bar issuance of a new birth certificate as hereinafter
provided. This copy of said decree or report shall be filed with and remain a
part of the records of the bureau of vital records and health statistics.
(5) Upon receipt by the bureau of vital records and health statistics of
the certified report of adoption, a new certificate of birth shall be issued
(but only in cases where such person's birth is already recorded with the bu-
reau of vital records and health statistics) bearing among other things the


name of the person adopted, as shown in the report of adoption, except that
a new certificate of birth shall not be established if so requested by the
court decreeing the adoption, the adoptive parents, or the adopted person.
No such birth certificate shall have reference to the adoption of said per-
son. Such birth certificate shall supplant and constitute a replacement of
any birth certificate previously issued for said person and shall be the only
birth certificate open to public inspection. Provided however, upon good
cause shown and the affidavit of the adoptive parents that a diligent search
has been made, but no certificate of birth for the adoptive child can be lo-
cated, the magistrate judge may order the adoptive child examined, at the ex-
pense of the adoptive parents, by a doctor of medicine licensed by the state
of Idaho. The examination will be conducted pursuant to rules promulgated by
the state board of health and welfare for the purpose of determining those
matters required for the issuance of an original birth certificate. Upon
the examination of the doctor made pursuant to the rules of the state board
of health and welfare, the court may order the bureau of vital records and
health statistics to issue an original birth certificate for the adoptive
child based upon those facts determined by the examination and included in
the court's order. In such case, a certified copy of the court order shall be
provided to the bureau of vital records and health statistics.
(6) In respect to form and nature of contents, such a new birth certifi-
cate shall be identical with a birth certificate issued to natural parents
for the birth of a child, except that the adoptive parents shall be shown as
parents and the adopted person shall have the name assigned by the decree of
adoption as shown on the report of adoption. In a case where a single person
adopts another person, any new birth certificate may designate the adopting
parent as adoptive.
(7) Whenever an adoption decree is amended, annulled, or rescinded, the
clerk of the court shall forward a certified copy of the amendment, annul-
ment, or rescindment to the bureau of vital records and health statistics in
accordance with the time provisions in subsection (3) of this section. Un-
less otherwise directed by the court, the bureau of vital records and health
statistics shall amend the certificate of birth upon receipt of a certified
copy of an amended decree of adoption. Upon receipt of a certified copy of a
decree of annulment or rescindment of adoption, the original certificate of
birth shall be restored to its place in the files and the new certificate and
evidence shall not be subject to inspection except upon order of a court of
record of this state.
(8) All records and information specified in this section, other than a
new birth certificate issued hereunder, and all records, files, and infor-
mation of any court in this state relating to adoption proceedings shall not
be open to inspection except as provided in section 39-259A, Idaho Code, or
upon the order of a court of record of this state; provided however, that the
provisions of section 16-1616, Idaho Code, to the contrary notwithstanding,
any magistrate judge may furnish a certified copy of a decree of adoption to
any duly authorized agency of the United States or the state of Idaho without
procuring any prior court order therefor.
(9) For adoptions that occur on or after July 1, 2022, the provisions of
this section shall apply, except that the natural or adoptive parentage of


each parent shall be demonstrated as determined by the registrar on the face
of a new birth certificate described in subsection (6) of this section.
(10) For all adoptions, a copy of the original birth certificate, all
medical and demographic information contained in the sealed file, and the
report of adoption must be provided upon the signed request, on a form pre-
scribed by the registrar, of the adoptee who is named on the birth certifi-
cate or such adoptee's legal representative, provided that:
(a) The adoptee must be eighteen (18) years of age or older;
(b) The documents referenced in this subsection will be released to the
adult adoptee upon completion of the voluntary adoption registration
process. In the event of a match on the voluntary adoption registry, a
minimum thirty (30) day waiting period will apply, during which time a
registered birth parent may:
(i) Indicate a preferred method of contact, which method will
be communicated to the adoptee at the time the documents are re-
leased;
(ii) Request no contact, which request will be communicated to the
adoptee at the time the documents are released; or
(iii) Request that the registered birth parent's name and any
other personally identifying information be redacted before
records are released, which request shall be effective for five
(5) years. After the five (5) years have elapsed, the adoptee may
again request documents according to this subsection, and all pro-
visions of this subsection shall apply; and
(c) The bureau of vital records and health statistics is not obligated
to provide court records to the adoptee under the provisions of this
subsection.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.